Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
PART 1 General Provisions

37-4-20 through 37-4-22.
[Reserved]

History.
Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 734, § 5; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1160, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-18; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 37/HB 1387; repealed by Ga.
L. 2011, p. 337, § 3/HB 324, effective July 1, 2011.

Code Commission notes.

Former Code Section 37-4-21 was repealed effective July 1, 2011, by operation of Ga. L. 2011, p. 337, § 3. However, Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 25, effective July 1, 2011, purported to amend Code Section 37-4-21 to substitute “a personal care home, as defined
in subsection (a) of Code Section 31-7-12, or an assisted living community, as defined in Code Section 31-7-12.2” for “or a personal care home, as defined in Code Section 31-7-12” in the last sentence of subsection (c). For effect
of subsequent amendment of a repealed statute, see Lampkin v. Pike,

115 Ga. 827
(1902).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 337, § 3/HB 324 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2011.